Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 5. Department of Buildings and General Services

§ 151.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 32(1), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 152.
Duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, in addition to the duties expressly set forth elsewhere by law, shall have the authority to:

Be responsible for the administration of the Department.

[Repealed.]

Prepare or cause to be prepared plans and specifications for construction and repair on all State-owned buildings:

For which the General Assembly or the Emergency Board has made specific appropriations. In consultation with the department or agency concerned, the Commissioner shall select sites, purchase lands, determine plans and specifications, and advertise for bids for the furnishing of materials and construction thereof and of appurtenances thereto. The Commissioner shall determine the time for beginning and completing the construction. Any change orders occurring under the contracts let as the result of actions previously mentioned in this section shall not be allowed unless they have the approval of the Secretary of Administration.

For which no specific appropriations have been made by the General Assembly or the Emergency Board. The Commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, acquire an option, for a price not to exceed $75,000.00, on an individual property without prior legislative approval, provided the option contains a provision stating that purchase of the property shall occur only upon the approval of the General Assembly and the appropriation of funds for this purpose. The State Treasurer is authorized to advance a sum not to exceed $75,000.00, upon warrants drawn by the Commissioner of Finance and Management for the purpose of purchasing an option on a property pursuant to this subdivision.

For which the Department of Buildings and General Services is granted a right of first refusal. The Commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, enter into an agreement that grants the Department of Buildings and General Services a right of first refusal to purchase property, provided that the right of first refusal contains a provision stating that the purchase of the property shall occur only upon the approval of the General Assembly.

Supervise construction, improvement, repair, alteration, demolition, and replacement of and addition to State buildings, structures, and facilities when the estimated cost thereof exceeds $3,000.00 except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, and highways as defined in

1 V.S.A. § 119

and aeronautics facilities. The Commissioner shall supervise the maintenance of all State buildings.

[Repealed.]

Determine the necessity of repairs and replacements to all State-owned buildings and cause urgent repairs and replacements to be accomplished if within the limits of specific appropriations or if approved by the Emergency Board. Urgency of the repairs, maximum need for the building, and appropriations available shall be the determining factors in deciding priority of repairs and replacements. When the Commissioner determines that repairs and replacements should be made; the Commissioner shall so report in writing to the department or agency having control of the building, and the Commissioner shall request written authorization from the head of that department or agency to initiate the action necessary to accomplish the repairs or replacements. The Commissioner shall forward a copy of his or her recommendations to the Secretary of Administration when the Commissioner considers the repairs or replacements recommended by the Commissioner to be urgent whenever the department or agency controlling the building has failed to request initiation of action within a reasonable time after the Commissioner’s second recommendation of action.

[Repealed.]

Employ such architectural and other professional assistance as he or she deems necessary in the performance of his or her duties. Before employing architectural and other professional assistance, the Commissioner shall give reasonable public notice of his or her intention to employ such assistance so as to allow full opportunity for any qualified expert to offer his or her services, and the Commissioner shall employ that architect or expert whose service will be in the best interests of the State.

This section shall not apply to State-owned buildings under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Military Department, and property at State airports under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Transportation. However, the Governor, by executive order, may place under the supervision of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services specified buildings or classes of buildings under the jurisdiction and control of the Departments named.

[Repealed.]

For State-owned buildings and structures that are under the jurisdiction of the Historic Preservation Division as historic sites, the Director of Historic Preservation shall have jurisdiction over determining maintenance and restoration to be done, and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall have jurisdiction over budgeting for and accomplishing the same.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may contract, after competitive bidding, for custodial and other maintenance services. No employee will be laid off or otherwise be removed from employment as a result of contracting out except in circumstances where the work is beyond the capacity of State employees, or that the work or program can be performed more economically under an outside contract, or that an outside contractor has management techniques, equipment, or technology that will result in better public service and increased productivity.

Ensure that electric heat for space heating is not used in new State buildings or in the reconstruction of State buildings, except where it is cost effective to do so on a life cycle cost basis. The Commissioner shall develop a work plan to phase out the existing use of electric heat in State buildings, where it is cost effective to do so on a life cycle cost basis, and shall include in the annual budget requests to the General Assembly work plans and budgets to accomplish this phase-out in a timely fashion.

Adopt rules to govern access to and conduct upon the grounds of and within the structures and buildings that fall within his or her jurisdiction. Specifically, and without limitation of the foregoing, the Commissioner is empowered to adopt rules governing access to property; littering; alcoholic beverages and narcotics; soliciting, debt collection, and campaigning; photographs for advertising or commercial purposes; pets and animals; and firearms and explosives while in State buildings under his or her jurisdiction or upon the grounds of these buildings, and in or upon property leased to the State and under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner.

Consult with the Secretary of Education, when requested by the Secretary, concerning school construction projects.

Allocate, at the Commissioner’s discretion, funds from projects appropriated to the Department of Buildings and General Services by any capital construction act adopted pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 701a

to contract for the services of engineers, architects, and other consultants required to complete projects authorized in such a capital construction act and under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner. The authorization of this subdivision shall not abrogate the authority of the Commissioner to postpone projects authorized by such a capital construction act if the best interests of the State would be served thereby.

Manage and expend all appropriations made in each annual capital construction act to the Department of Buildings and General Services under chapter 5 of this title. However, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may, with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, direct the Commissioner of Finance and Management to issue a warrant to pay the amount of any appropriation designated for use by an entity not affiliated with the Executive Branch directly to such entity.

Postpone any project authorized by an annual capital construction act under the authority of or funded through the Department of Buildings and General Services if, due to financial or economic conditions, the best interests of the State will be served by postponement.

Transfer any unexpended project balances between projects that are authorized within the same section of an annual capital construction act.

Transfer any unexpended project balances between projects that are authorized within different capital construction acts, with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, when the unexpended project balance does not exceed $100,000.00, or with the additional approval of the Emergency Board when such balance exceeds $100,000.00.

Cancel any authorized project if, due to financial or economic conditions, the best interests of the State will be served by cancellation, if approved by the Secretary of Administration, and postpone any authorized project if, due to financial or economic conditions, the best interests of the State will be served by postponement.

Use the contingency fund appropriation to cover shortfalls for any project approved in any capital construction act; however, transfers from the contingency in excess of $50,000.00 shall be done with the approval of the Secretary of Administration.

With the approval of the Secretary of Administration, transfer during any fiscal year to the Department of Buildings and General Services for use only for major maintenance within the Capitol Complex in Montpelier any unexpended balances of funds appropriated in any capital construction act for any Executive or Judicial Branch project, excluding any appropriations for State grant-in-aid programs, which is completed or substantially completed as determined by the Commissioner. On or before January 15 of each year, the Commissioner shall report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions regarding all transfers and expenditures made pursuant to this subdivision. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subdivision.

Accept from the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) hazard mitigation grants on behalf of the State on an as-needed basis, or accept from any municipality any funds received by the municipality from FEMA. This authority is intended to permit the State to assist towns in certain situations by taking advantage of federal money in order to avoid depletion of State resources.

Transfer any unexpended project balances from previous capital construction acts for the purpose of emergency projects not authorized in a capital construction act in an amount not to exceed $100,000.00, provided the Commissioner shall send timely written notice of such expenditures to the Chairs of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions.

Be available to consult with and share the Department’s expertise with school districts regarding the design, construction, or purchase of any new buildings or alterations of existing buildings in connection with any career technical center receiving funding under Title 16. The Commissioner, in collaboration with the Secretary of Education, shall periodically update the standards developed pursuant to 2000 Acts and Resolves No. 148, Sec. 44.

After consulting with the State Treasurer to determine the effect of the contract on the State’s debt and reviewing the creditworthiness of the company with which the State proposes to contract, and with the approval of the Emergency Board, enter into multiyear contracts with energy service companies or third-party leasing companies for energy efficiency and fuel switching improvements to State facilities, the cost of which will be recovered through the avoided fuel, utility, operating, and maintenance costs resulting from the improvements. Improvements must within 20 years achieve savings sufficient to cover their costs.

With the approval of the Emergency Board, enter into performance contracts with private sector providers to create energy-smart State buildings and facilities primarily through revised operating strategies that will result in operating cost savings. The Commissioner shall work with private energy contractors and utilities companies to develop a plan to conduct energy audits, analyze the State’s energy needs, improve purchasing procedures to speed the conversion to new technology, and develop revised operating strategies to identify the best use of the latest energy-saving technology.

When purchasing land for new State highway garages and other transportation buildings, as well as other State buildings on major highways in the State, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, shall consider purchasing additional land suitable for park-and-ride facilities.

Provide services to the traveling public, lease space, sell products, and conduct any other activities within limits set forth in the federal Surface Transportation Act and Randolph-Sheppard Act and rules adopted thereunder, to administer the information and welcome centers, and use funds generated in the centers to supplement funds for maintaining and operating the centers.

Receive payments from vendors through the Real-Time Demand Response Program. The Commissioner may contract with third-party brokers or directly with independent system operators to generate or to reduce electrical demand, or both, for State-owned facilities in return for payments to the State that shall be retained by the Facilities Operations Revolving Fund established in section 160a of this title.

Accept funds and other contributions for State House renovations and restorations; educational, interpretive, and curatorial projects; and acquisition of historic furnishings, fixtures, and works of art for projects that pertain to the State House.

Accept grants of funds, equipment, and services from any source, including federal appropriations, for the installation, operation, implementation, or maintenance of energy conservation measures or improvements at State buildings, provided that the Commissioner shall report receipt of a grant under this subdivision to the Chairs of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions.

Sell thermal energy to the City of Montpelier at a price set by the Commissioner.

Accept from the Department of Public Service, the City of Montpelier, or other entity grant funds for renovations to the Capital District Heat Plant.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall:

Prior to transfer of unexpended balances between projects under the provisions of this section or another provision of law, consult with the State Treasurer and the Commissioner of Finance and Management to determine that such transfer does not adversely affect the exclusion from gross income of the interest on the bonds from which such unexpended proceeds are derived, pursuant to Section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any corresponding Internal Revenue Code section of the United States, as from time to time amended. The Commissioner shall notify the State Treasurer within 30 days of the postponement of any authorized projects for which bonds have been issued.

Consult with the State Treasurer regarding implementation of projects in each capital appropriations act, including the disposition of assets purchased with capital appropriations, with regard to satisfactory resolution of issues associated with legal and tax-exempt status of outstanding State bonds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is authorized to:

Implement a “Motorist Aid Refreshment Program” at State rest areas and information centers. The Commissioner is authorized to accept, without active solicitation, donations for the services and associated supplies and may use surplus funds to pay for the Information Center Program.

Permit nonprofit organizations and contracted information center operators to provide free refreshments to motorists. Nonprofits and contracted information center operators may accept voluntary donations, without active solicitation, from motorists.

Adopt rules governing the provision of refreshments in accordance with this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

1961, No. 17

, §§ 1, 2, eff. March 15, 1961;

1977, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 183;

1979, No. 74

, §§ 345, 346;

1979, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 139, eff. May 9, 1980;

1981, No. 108

, § 331(b);

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 11, 1984;

1983, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1984;

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 32(2), 33, eff. June 13, 1988;

1991, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1993, No. 59

, § 25c, eff. June 3, 1993;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. May 6, 1996;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 296;

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 87, eff. May 22, 1996;

1999, No. 29

, § 39, eff. May 19, 1999;

2001, No. 61

, § 25;

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 25, 32, 34, 64, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 56

, § 59, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 27, 31, eff. June 8, 2004;

2005, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 34, 49, eff. May 15, 2006;

2007, No. 52

, §§ 30, 31, eff. May 28, 2007;

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. June 9, 2008;

2009, No. 33

, § 54;

2009, No. 43

, §§ 27, 28, eff. May 27, 2009;

2009, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 23, 24;

2011, No. 40

, § 34a, eff. May 20, 2011;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 14, 2012;

2013, No. 51

, § 33, eff. May 29, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 280, 281, 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2015, No. 23

, § 133;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 171;

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 21, 2018;

2021, No. 74

, § E.103.2.

§ 153.
Parking rules.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may from time to time make, amend, revise, or repeal parking rules for the use of land or structures either owned or leased by the State and that are under his or her jurisdiction and control.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 4

, eff. Feb. 17, 1969; amended

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984.

§ 153a.
Use of conference rooms by legislators.

Conference rooms in State office buildings shall be made available for use by members of the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 66, eff. June 21, 1994.

§ 154.
Preservation of State House and historic State buildings.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall give special consideration to the State House as a building of first historical importance and significance. He or she shall preserve the State House structure and its unique interior and exterior architectural form and design, with particular attention to the detail of form and design, in addition to keeping the buildings, its furnishings, facilities, appurtenances, appendages, and grounds surrounding and attached to it in the best possible physical and functional condition. Any permanent change, alteration, addition, or removal in form, materials, design, architectural detail, furnishing, fixed in place or otherwise, interior or exterior, of the State House may not be made without legislative mandate. Emergency and immediately necessary repairs may, however, be made without legislative mandate upon prior approval of the Governor.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984;

2017, No. 84

, § 26, eff. June 16, 2017.

§ 154a.
State Curator.

Creation. The position of State Curator is created within the Department of Buildings and General Services.

Duties. The State Curator’s responsibilities shall include:

oversight of the general historic preservation of the State House, including maintaining the historical integrity of the State House and works of art in the State House;

interpretation of the State House to the visiting public through exhibits, publications, and tours; and

acquisition, management, and care of State collections of art and historic furnishings, provided that any works of art for the State House are acquired pursuant to the requirements of

2 V.S.A. § 653(a)

.

Acquisition policy. In coordination with the Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House, and in accordance with the plan developed pursuant to

2 V.S.A. § 653

, the State Curator shall adopt an acquisition policy that ensures that the acquisition of art for the State House reflects a diversity of artistic media and artists, the natural history of the State, and the diversity of the people and stories of Vermont throughout the history of the State.

Interpretive plan. In coordination with the Friends of the Vermont State House and the Vermont Historical Society, the State Curator shall create an interpretive plan that tells the stories of the State House art collection through accessible written, multimedia, and oral means. The plan shall include appropriate and inclusive training of State House volunteers and staff.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 84

, § 27, eff. June 16, 2017; amended

2019, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. July 6, 2020.

§ 155.
Repealed. 2015, No. 160 (Adj. Sess.), § 26, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 156.
City of Montpelier District Heat Plant Maintenance Reserve Fund.

There is established a special fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 known as the City of Montpelier District Heat Plant Maintenance Reserve Fund.

The Fund shall comprise payments from the City of Montpelier for the City’s share of the maintenance of the District Heat Plant.

Monies in the Fund shall be available to the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services for the maintenance of the District Heat Plant upon commencement of the District Heat Plant’s operations.

The Commissioner of Finance and Management may draw warrants for disbursements from this Fund in anticipation of receipts. Any remaining balance at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward in the Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 26

, § 31, eff. May 18, 2015.

§ 157.
Facilities condition analysis.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall:

maintain the condition of buildings and infrastructure under the Commissioner’s jurisdiction to provide a safe and healthy environment through sustainable practices and judicious capital renewal;

conduct a facilities condition analysis each year of 20 percent of the building area and infrastructure under the Commissioner’s jurisdiction; and

conduct investment grade energy audits to develop a pipeline of energy efficiency and conservation measures to be implemented through the State Energy Management Program or during construction projects.

The Commissioner may use up to four percent of the funds appropriated to the Department of Buildings and General Services for major maintenance and planning for the purpose described in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 7, 2012; amended

2013, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. June 9, 2014;

2017, No. 84

, § 23, eff. June 16, 2017;

2019, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 6, 2020.

§ 158.
Repealed. 2009, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 26(12)(B).

§ 159.
Building maintenance; appropriations.

The sums appropriated for facilities operations shall be continuing and shall not revert to the State Treasury at the end of the fiscal year and may be added to succeeding appropriations for facilities operations.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 32; amended

1965, No. 86

;

1973, No. 39

;

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 297.

§ 160.
Property Management Revolving Fund.

There is established a Property Management Revolving Fund to provide space for office accommodations and other related purposes for which space is not available in buildings owned by the State. Space may be provided through the Fund for such departments or programs as the Secretary of Administration determines, except that space requirements for the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the department controlling buildings designated as historic sites, the Military Department, and the Department of Labor shall be covered by this section only by executive order of the Governor.

The Fund shall consist of:

monies that are appropriated to the Fund, or that are paid to it under authorization of the Emergency Board;

the proceeds of rental income received by the Department of Buildings and General Services from the leasing of property under its supervision; and

fees to be paid by departments and agencies which shall be fixed by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services subject to the approval of the Secretary of Administration, based on rentals, janitorial services, supplies, and other expenses necessarily incurred in providing space for such agencies.

Monies from the Fund shall be expended for rental of property for the purposes contemplated in this section, and to defray the cost of custodial services and other expenses necessary to the proper use and enjoyment of such premises by the occupant. Monies from the Fund may also be expended for management of buildings and property under the jurisdiction of the Department of Buildings and General Services, including inventory, appraisal, space study and allocation, and renovations. Cost of studies, renovations, alterations, and modifications shall not exceed $50,000.00 unless approved by the Secretary of Administration.

The Department of Buildings and General Services shall be responsible for administering the interests of the State in all existing leases and rentals for purposes that are designated in subsection (a) of this section in which the State is either a landlord or a tenant and where the name of another department or agency appears in any such lease, the Department of Buildings and General Services shall serve as the representative of that agency with all rights and responsibilities therein provided. All leases, rentals, or renewals for the benefit of departments or agencies to which this section applies shall, beginning on July 1, 1969, be made and executed by and in the name of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall supervise the receipt and expenditure of monies comprising the Property Management Revolving Fund, subject to the provisions of this section. He or she shall maintain accurate and complete records of all such receipts and expenditures and shall make an annual report on the condition of the Fund to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions. All balances remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried over to the following year.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 60

; amended

1977, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 184;

1981, No. 66

, § 5, eff. May 1, 1981;

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 11, 1984;

1983, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1984;

1985, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.), § 307;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. May 6, 1996;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2009, No. 33

, § 55;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 14, 2012;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 172.

§ 160a.
Facilities Operations Internal Service Fund.

There is created a Facilities Operations Internal Service Fund in the Department of Buildings and General Services. The purpose of this Fund is to provide for:

operating expenses for buildings, support facilities, and grounds;

maintenance expenditures on buildings, support facilities, and grounds;

major maintenance and renovation projects for buildings and support facilities;

relocation expenses for State agencies;

purchase of options for real estate acquisitions;

payments to build or acquire buildings or support facilities as approved by the Legislature; and

debt service payments on general obligation bonds authorized to build or acquire buildings and support facilities.

The Fund shall consist of:

Monies that are appropriated to the Fund or that are paid to it under authorization of the Emergency Board.

The proceeds of rental income received by the Department of Buildings and General Services from the leasing of buildings and property under its supervision.

Fees paid by departments and agencies including the Legislative and Judicial Branches. The rate of said fees shall be proposed by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services subject to the approval of the Secretary of Administration. Proposed rates shall be based upon the cost of operations, debt service, and depreciation.

Revenue derived from the sale of properties.

Monies recovered from tenants for discretionary expenditures for services beyond the normal standards of facilities services.

Monies recovered as a result of litigation relating to facilities operations, construction, or renovations.

Funds received from the maintenance or operation of condominium facilities, including properties owned by nongovernmental persons or entities, in condominium facilities in which the State has an ownership interest.

All balances remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried over to the following year.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 270; amended

2001, No. 61

, § 29;

2001, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 310, eff. June 16, 2002;

2011, No. 63

, § E.121.

§ 160b.
Sale of milk and milk products at information centers.

The Division for the Blind and Visually Impaired is encouraged to sell milk and milk products, with a preference for the sale of Vermont-produced milk whenever feasible, in vending machines at rest areas and information centers in this State according to policies and rules established by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.

The Commissioner shall designate areas within rest areas and welcome centers for the sale of milk and milk products with an emphasis on the sale of Vermont-made products. The Commissioner, at his or her sole discretion, shall have the authority to designate the areas where sales may occur.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 63

, § 72, eff. June 11, 2003.

§ 160c.
Nutrition procurement standards.

The Commissioner of Health shall establish and post on the Department’s website nutrition procurement standards that:
(a) (1) The Commissioner of Health shall establish and post on the Department’s website nutrition procurement standards that:

consider relevant guidance documents, including those published by the U.S. General Services Administration, the American Heart Association, and the National Alliance for Nutrition and Activity and, upon request, the Department shall provide a rationale for any divergence from these guidance documents;

consider both positive and negative contributions of nutrients, ingredients, and food groups to diets, including calories, portion size, saturated fat, trans fat, sodium, sugar, and the presence of fruits, vegetables, whole grains, and other nutrients of concern in Americans’ diets; and

contain exceptions for circumstances in which State-procured foods or beverages are intended for individuals with specific dietary needs.

The Commissioner shall review and, if necessary, amend the nutrition procurement standards at least every five years to reflect advances in nutrition science, dietary data, new product availability, and updates to federal Dietary Guidelines for Americans.

All foods and beverages purchased, sold, served, or otherwise provided by the State or any entity, subdivision, or employee on behalf of the State shall meet the minimum nutrition procurement standards established by the Commissioner of Health.
(b) (1) All foods and beverages purchased, sold, served, or otherwise provided by the State or any entity, subdivision, or employee on behalf of the State shall meet the minimum nutrition procurement standards established by the Commissioner of Health.

All bids and contracts between the State and food and beverage vendors shall comply with the nutrition procurement standards. The Commissioner, in conjunction with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, may periodically review or audit a contracting food or beverage vendor’s financial reports to ensure compliance with this section.

The Governor’s Health in All Policies Task Force may disseminate information to State employees on the Commissioner’s nutrition procurement standards.

All State-owned or -operated vending machines, food or beverage vendors contracting with the State, or cafeterias located on property owned or operated by the State shall display nutritional labeling to the extent permitted under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. ch. 9 § 301 et seq.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall incorporate the nutrition procurement standards established by the Commissioner into the appropriate procurement document.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 161.
Requirements on State construction projects.

Bids; selection.

When the construction cost of any State project exceeds the sum of $50,000.00, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall publicly advertise or invite three or more bids. The contract for any such State project or improvement shall be awarded to one of the three lowest responsible bidders, conforming to specification, with consideration being given to quantities involved, time required for delivery, purpose for which required, competency and responsibility of bidder, and his or her ability to render satisfactory service, but the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, shall have the right to reject any and all bids and to invite other bids.

When using the design-build construction delivery process, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall publicly advertise or invite three or more bids. The award of a design-build contract shall be to the bidder determined by the Commissioner to be most responsive to evaluation criteria established by the Commissioner. Such criteria may include physical plant characteristics proposed, program response to space needs, ability of the design-build team, anticipated development schedule and overall cost considerations, including alternates, allowances, and schedule of values.

All bids on State projects shall be required to comply with all applicable provisions of Title 21.

Each contract awarded under this section for any State project with a construction cost exceeding $100,000.00 or a construction project with a construction cost exceeding $200,000.00 which is authorized and is at least 50 percent funded by a capital construction act pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 701a

shall provide that all construction employees working on the project shall be paid no less than the mean prevailing wage published periodically by the Vermont Department of Labor in its occupational employment and wage survey plus an additional fringe benefit of 42 and one-half percent of wage, as calculated by the current Vermont prevailing wage survey. As used in this section, “fringe benefits” means benefits, including paid vacations and holidays, sick leave, employer contributions and reimbursements to health insurance and retirement benefits, and similar benefits that are incidents of employment.

In the construction of any State project, local capable labor shall be utilized whenever practicable, but this section shall not be construed to compel any person to discharge or lay off any regular employee.

Subsections (a) through (c) of this section shall not apply to maintenance or construction projects carried out by the Agency of Transportation and by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

The Agency of Administration shall ensure that the State and any of its subdivisions do not contract, directly or indirectly, with employers who are prohibited from contracting by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to

21 V.S.A. §§ 692

, 708, and 1314a or the Commissioner of Financial Regulation pursuant to

8 V.S.A. § 3661

.

The Agency of Administration shall maintain a current list of employers that have been prohibited from contracting with the State or any of its subdivisions, and the Agencies of Administration and of Transportation shall publish that list on their websites.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 115

, §§ 1-3, eff. April 25, 1973; amended

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 76, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. May 6, 1996;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 72, eff. April 29, 1998;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. May 24, 2000;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 5b;

2015, No. 26

, § 24a, eff. May 18, 2015;

2015, No. 26

, § 24b, eff. July 1, 2017;

2015, No. 69

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 162.
Easements and rights-of-way.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is authorized to grant easements and rights-of-way in connection with projects and land under his or her jurisdiction. In the event that the easement or right-of-way ceases to be used for the purpose granted, title to the easement shall revert to the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 48

; amended

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984;

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. May 22, 1996.

§ 163.
[Reserved.]

§ 164.
Leases.

The Governor may lease any land he or she deems can be used to advantage by the State in connection with any State institution or department.
Leases so entered into shall be kept on file in the office of the Secretary of State.
The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrants for obligations incurred under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(a);

2003, No. 63

, § 26.